Texas, session 891, SB50.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 28.004(e), Education Code, is amended to read as follows: (e)  Any course materials and instruction relating to human sexuality, sexually transmitted diseases, or human immunodeficiency virus or acquired immune deficiency syndrome shall be selected by the board of trustees with the advice of the local school health advisory council and must: (1)  present abstinence from sexual activity as the preferred choice of behavior in relationship to all sexual activity for unmarried persons of school age; (2)  devote more attention to abstinence from sexual activity than to any other behavior; (3)  emphasize that abstinence from sexual activity, if used consistently and correctly, is the only method that is 100 percent effective in preventing pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases, infection with human immunodeficiency virus or acquired immune deficiency syndrome, and the emotional trauma associated with adolescent sexual activity; (4)  direct adolescents to a standard of behavior in which abstinence from sexual activity before marriage is the most effective way to prevent pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases, and infection with human immunodeficiency virus or acquired immune deficiency syndrome; and (5)  include instruction on [teach] contraception that: (A)  is based on: (i)  guidelines issued by a federal agency; or (ii)  information provided by the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists; and (B)  includes: (i)  the evidence-based efficacy of contraceptive methods; and (ii)  the appropriate use of contraceptive methods, including information on the [and condom use in terms of] human use reality rates of the use of condoms, oral contraceptives, long-acting reversible contraceptives, and vasectomies [instead of theoretical laboratory rates, if instruction on contraception and condoms is included in curriculum content]. SECTION 2.  This Act applies beginning with the 2026-2027 school year. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.